Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1719.03
Collection of taxes, personal; distress warrant; acceptance of partial payment.

In any case where any distress warrant includes taxes for one year or more, the sheriff may, in his or her discretion, accept partial payment and shall pay the same, as received, to the county treasurer, who shall accept the same and receipt the sheriff therefor. Pursuant to section 77-1704.02, the county treasurer may accept the partial payment and hold such amounts until the accumulated payments are sufficient to pay the full amount of the delinquency for one year and any interest, penalties, or other charges due to the delinquency. Notwithstanding any partial payment, the sheriff shall make levy and return thereof, on the distress warrant, as required by law.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 155, p. 444;

Laws 1911, c. 106, § 1, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 6484;

C.S.1922, § 6011;

C.S.1929, § 77-1916;

Laws 1943, c. 181, § 2, p. 628;

R.S.1943, § 77-1719;

Laws 1947, c. 259, § 2(4), p. 848;

Laws 1963, c. 456, § 1, p. 1482;

Laws 2005, LB 18, § 1.